Illinois, session 104th, HB5051.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Student Transfer Achievement Reform Act is 5amended by changing Section 23 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 150/23)7    Sec. 23. Reverse transfer of credits.8    (a) In this Section, "reverse transfer of credit" means 9the transfer of earned academic credit from a State university 10to a community college for the purpose of obtaining an 11associate degree at the community college.12    (b) The Beginning with the 2019-2020 academic year, the 13Board of Higher Education and the Illinois Community College 14Board shall develop a policy to foster the reverse transfer of 15credit for any student who has accumulated at least 30 15 hours 16of academic credit at a community college and a sufficient 17number of hours of academic credit at a State university in the 18prescribed courses necessary to meet a community college's 19requirements to be awarded an associate degree.20    (b-5) Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, each 21State university shall automatically notify any transfer 22student accepted to the State university with at least 30 23hours of academic credit at a community college of the option   HB5051- 2 -LRB104 19767 LNS 33217 b1for the reverse transfer of credit within the student's first 2term of enrollment. The notification shall include the State 3university's opt-in process for reverse transfer that provides 4for the sharing of the student's transcript information 5between the community college and State university. 6    (c) A student wishing to reverse transfer earned academic 7credit under this Section to obtain an associate degree shall 8agree to the exchange of transcript information between each 9community college and State university that he or she has 10attended. The community college shall provide notification to 11the student with instructions on application for conferral of 12an associate degree. The A student must submit the an 13application and his or her transcripts to the a community 14college in order to be considered for conferral of an 15associate degree. In awarding an associate degree, the 16community college shall evaluate the applicant's coursework 17completed, along with the transfer credit earned, and shall 18determine whether the associate degree requirements have been 19met. No later than 30 business days after receiving the an 20application, the a community college shall notify the an 21applicant if he or she qualifies for an associate degree based 22on the total earned credits.23    (d) The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community 24College Board, and the Midwestern Higher Education Compact's 25Multi-State Collaborative on Military Credit shall adopt a 26policy regarding the award of academic credit for military   HB5051- 3 -LRB104 19767 LNS 33217 b1training applicable to meeting a community college's 2requirements for awarding an associate degree.3    (d-5) A community college or State university may not 4charge an application, transfer evaluation, or graduation fee 5or any other fee associated with conferral of an associate 6degree through reverse transfer under this Section.7    (d-10) A community college shall include each student 8awarded an associate degree through reverse transfer under 9this Section within its student information system. 10    (e) The Board of Higher Education and the Illinois 11Community College Board shall adopt rules to implement this 12Section. 13(Source: P.A. 100-824, eff. 8-13-18.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.